Washington statutes.
RCW 4.36.240

Harmless error disregarded.

The court shall, in every stage of an action, disregard any error or defect in pleadings or proceedings which shall not affect the substantial rights of the adverse party, and no judgment shall be reversed or affected by reason of such error or defect.

[Code 1881 s 113; 1877 p 24 s 113; 1854 p 144 s 71; RRS s 307.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. RAP 2.4(a), 18.22.